Wisconsin, session 2025, AB605.
do enact as follows:AB605,11Section 1. 289.67 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 289.67 (1) (b) 1. and 2amended to read:AB605,2,93289.67 (1) (b) 1. The Except as provided in subd. 2., the owner or operator of a 4licensed solid or hazardous waste disposal facility shall collect the environmental 5repair fee from the generator, a person who arranges for disposal on behalf of one or 6more generators or an intermediate hauler and shall pay to the department the 7amount of the fees required to be collected according to the amount of solid or 8hazardous waste received and disposed of at the facility during the preceding 9reporting period.AB605,210Section 2. 289.67 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB605,2,1511289.67 (1) (b) 2. If the owner or operator of a municipal solid waste facility 12receives a loan under the clean water fund program under s. 281.58 for waste water 13treatment infrastructure, the owner or operator of the municipal solid waste facility 14may retain, of the amounts collected under subd. 1., an amount equal to the total 15principal and interest owed on the loan while the loan is in repayment.AB605,2,1616